Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-10,139.05
Reimbursement; amount; calculation; how paid.

The department shall annually reimburse each participating public school from the Hunger-Free Schools Cash Fund and each participating nonpublic school from the General Fund a portion of the cost of each eligible meal served by such school during the second preceding school fiscal year in an amount equal to the difference between the federal reimbursement rate for a free meal and the federal reimbursement rate for a reduced-price meal for each eligible meal. The calculation of the reimbursement for each eligible meal shall be based on the federal reimbursement rates for a school breakfast or a school lunch as applicable to the eligible meal.

Laws 2026, LB966, § 5.
July 18, 2026